Tennessee, session 114, HB1138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-105-105(a), is amended by
deleting "shall provide documentation in a timely manner" and substituting "shall provide
documentation in a timely manner and at no cost to the owner or occupant".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1138
000135
- 1 -